Utah statutes.
32B-4-201.   Applicability of Utah Code of Criminal Procedure.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, the procedure in a criminal case arising under this title is governed by Title 77, Utah Code of Criminal Procedure, and any other rules adopted by the Utah Supreme Court.

